Missouri, session 2026, HCR39.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
WHEREAS, Article V of the Constitution of the United States requires a convention
to be called by the Congress of the United States for the purpose of proposing an amendment
to the Constitution upon application of two-thirds of the Legislatures of the several states; and

WHEREAS, the Founders of the United States of America who designed our
Constitution sought to balance and limit the power of the federal government against the
states and the federal income tax undermines the Constitution's arrangements for balancing
and limiting the federal government; and

WHEREAS, the Legislature of the State of Missouri favors a proposal and
ratification of an amendment to the U.S. Constitution, which shall repeal the Sixteenth
Amendment of the Constitution of the United States of America and declare that Congress
shall have no power to lay and collect taxes on incomes, from whatever source derived,
except in time of war declared by the Congress:

NOW THEREFORE BE IT RESOLVED that the members of the House of
Representatives of the One Hundred Third General Assembly, Second Regular Session, the
Senate concurring therein, hereby make an application to Congress, as provided by Article V
of the Constitution of the United States of America, to call a convention limited to proposing
an amendment to the Constitution of the United States of America to repeal the Sixteenth

HCR 39 2
Amendment and remove the power of the federal government to lay and collect taxes on
incomes; and

BE IT FURTHER RESOLVED that this application shall be considered as covering
the same subject matter as the applications from other states to Congress to call a convention
to repeal the Sixteenth Amendment and remove the power of the federal government to lay
and collect taxes on incomes, and this application shall be aggregated with the same for the
purpose of attaining the two-thirds of states necessary to require Congress to call a limited
convention on this subject but shall not be aggregated with any other applications on any
other subject; and

BE IT FURTHER RESOLVED that the Chief Clerk of the Missouri House of
Representatives be instructed to prepare a properly inscribed copy of this resolution for the
President and Secretary of the United States Senate; the Speaker, Clerk, and Judiciary
Committee Chair of the United States House of Representatives; each member of the
Missouri Congressional Delegation; and the presiding officers of each of the legislative
houses in the several states requesting their cooperation.
✔